Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-108 Reciprocal insurer. A
reciprocal insurer means an unincorporated aggregation of subscribers operating
individually and collectively through an attorney-in-fact common to all such
persons to provide reciprocal insurance among themselves. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next